Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 28.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-128
Statement of denial.

(ULLCA 303) A person named in a filed
statement of authority granting that person authority may deliver to the Secretary
of State for filing a statement of denial that:

(1) provides the name
of the limited liability company and the caption of the statement of authority
to which the statement of denial pertains; and

(2) denies the grant of authority.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 28.